Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 2

General Home Repairs and Improvements Contractors

7-62-201. Building permits.

Subject to the local approval provisions of §7-62-205, building permits for general home repairs and improvements shall be issued only in accordance with §§7-62-202 and7-62-203.

Acts 1986, ch. 688, § 1.

7-62-202. Number of building permits.

An unlimited number of building permits for general home repairs and improvements may be issued to contractors licensed by the state of Tennessee.

Not more than ten (10) active building permits for general home repairs and improvements may be issued to an unlicensed contractor who on April 8, 1986, is in the business of general home repairs and maintenance.

Acts 1986, ch. 688, § 1.

7-62-203. Bonding of unlicensed contractors.

Any person who enters into a contracting business of general home repairs and maintenance after April 8, 1986, if such person is an unlicensed contractor by the state of Tennessee, shall, for a period of not less than two (2) years, be required to post a cash bond in an amount sufficient to cover the cost of all services, labor, and materials used by such contractor or any immediate or remote subcontractor under such person for all such permits. The bond so given shall be filed with the appropriate governmental office issuing such permit and shall remain filed with such office until a copy is submitted to such office on the form required by §66-11-205, notifying the owner that no claims have been made to the contractor by, nor is any suit pending on behalf of, any contractors, subcontractors, laborers or materialmen, and that no chattel mortgages or conditional bills of sale have been given or are now outstanding as to any materials, appliances, fixtures or furnishings placed upon or installed in the premises for which such permit was issued. The governing body may extend this period based on the number of outstanding complaints or judgments obtained against such contractor for breach of contract or failing to comply with applicable laws and regulations.

Acts 1986, ch. 688, § 1.

7-62-204. Notice of building permit applicants.

If an individual makes application for a building permit for general home repairs and maintenance, the issuing authority shall advise the individual of this part, especially as it relates to the protection provided to the general public in requiring a cash bond for unlicensed contractors under §7-62-203.

Acts 1986, ch. 688, § 1.

7-62-205. Local approval.

This part shall apply in any county that by resolution of its county legislative body, or in any incorporated municipality that, by ordinance of its governing body, elects to come under this part. Such governing body shall also provide the mechanism to ensure that no more than ten (10) active permits are in force at any one (1) time under §7-62-202(b), for the filing and releasing of bonds under §7-62-203, and for the notification provisions of §7-62-204.

Acts 1986, ch. 688, § 1.